Washington statutes.
RCW 26.18.035

Other civil and criminal remedies applicable.

Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of the attorney general or prosecuting attorney to use any and all civil and criminal remedies to enforce child support obligations regardless of whether or not the custodial parent receives public assistance payments.

[ 1984 c 260 s 24.]